apertium-pl-uk.translit-uk-std.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГҐДЕЄЖЗИІЇЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЦЧШЩЮЯЬабвгґдеєжзиіїйклмнопрстуфхцчшщюяь</alphabet>
    <pardefs>
      <pardef n="common">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>б</l><r>b</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>в</l><r>v</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>г</l><r>h</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ґ</l><r>g</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>д</l><r>d</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>е</l><r>e</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>з</l><r>z</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>и</l><r>y</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>і</l><r>i</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>к</l><r>k</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>л</l><r>l</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>м</l><r>m</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>н</l><r>n</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>о</l><r>o</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>п</l><r>p</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>р</l><r>r</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>с</l><r>s</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>т</l><r>t</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>у</l><r>u</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ф</l><r>f</r></p></e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="common_caps">
        <e><p><l>А</l><r>A</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Б</l><r>B</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>В</l><r>V</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Г</l><r>H</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ґ</l><r>G</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Д</l><r>D</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Е</l><r>E</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>З</l><r>Z</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>И</l><r>Y</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>І</l><r>I</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>К</l><r>K</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Л</l><r>L</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>М</l><r>M</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Н</l><r>N</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>О</l><r>O</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>П</l><r>P</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Р</l><r>R</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>С</l><r>S</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Т</l><r>T</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>У</l><r>U</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ф</l><r>F</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ж</l><r>Zh</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Х</l><r>Kh</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ц</l><r>Ts</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ч</l><r>Ch</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ш</l><r>Sh</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Щ</l><r>Shch</r></p></e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="common_allcaps">
        <e><p><l>Ж</l><r>ZH</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Х</l><r>KH</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ц</l><r>TS</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ч</l><r>CH</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ш</l><r>SH</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Щ</l><r>SHCH</r></p></e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="start">
        <e><p><l>є</l><r>ye</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ї</l><r>yi</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>й</l><r>y</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ю</l><r>yu</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>я</l><r>ya</r></p></e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="start_caps">
        <e><p><l>Є</l><r>Ye</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ї</l><r>Yi</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Й</l><r>Y</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ю</l><r>Yu</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Я</l><r>Ya</r></p></e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="start_allcaps">
        <e><p><l>Є</l><r>YE</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ї</l><r>YI</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Й</l><r>Y</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ю</l><r>YU</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Я</l><r>YA</r></p></e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="middle">
        <e><p><l>є</l><r>ie</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ї</l><r>i</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>й</l><r>i</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ю</l><r>iu</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>я</l><r>ia</r></p></e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="middle_caps">
        <e><p><l>Є</l><r>Ie</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ї</l><r>I</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Й</l><r>I</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ю</l><r>Iu</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Я</l><r>Ia</r></p></e>
      </pardef>
      <pardef n="middle_allcaps">
        <e><p><l>Є</l><r>IE</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ї</l><r>I</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Й</l><r>I</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ю</l><r>IU</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Я</l><r>IA</r></p></e>
      </pardef>
    </pardefs>
    <section id="translit-std" type="standard">

        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>б</l><r>b</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>в</l><r>v</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>г</l><r>h</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ґ</l><r>g</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>д</l><r>d</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>е</l><r>e</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>з</l><r>z</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>и</l><r>y</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>і</l><r>i</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>к</l><r>k</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>л</l><r>l</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>м</l><r>m</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>н</l><r>n</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>о</l><r>o</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>п</l><r>p</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>р</l><r>r</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>с</l><r>s</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>т</l><r>t</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>у</l><r>u</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ф</l><r>f</r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>А</l><r>A</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Б</l><r>B</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>В</l><r>V</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Г</l><r>H</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ґ</l><r>G</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Д</l><r>D</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Е</l><r>E</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>З</l><r>Z</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>И</l><r>Y</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>І</l><r>I</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>К</l><r>K</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Л</l><r>L</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>М</l><r>M</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Н</l><r>N</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>О</l><r>O</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>П</l><r>P</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Р</l><r>R</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>С</l><r>S</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Т</l><r>T</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>У</l><r>U</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ф</l><r>F</r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ж</l><r>zh</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>х</l><r>kh</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ц</l><r>ts</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ч</l><r>ch</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ш</l><r>sh</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>щ</l><r>shch</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ж</l><r>Zh</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Х</l><r>Kh</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ц</l><r>Ts</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ч</l><r>Ch</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Ш</l><r>Sh</r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>Щ</l><r>Shch</r></p></e>

<!--
      <e><par n="start_caps"/><par n="middle_lower"/></e>
      <e><par n="start_allcaps"/><par n="middle_allcaps"/></e>
      <e><par n="start_lower"/><par n="middle_lower"/></e>
-->
      <e><p><l>зг</l><r>zgh</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Зг</l><r>Zgh</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ЗГ</l><r>ZGH</r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>'є</l><r>ie</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'Є</l><r>IE</r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>п'є</l><r>pie</r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>іє</l><r>iie</r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ає</l><r>aie</r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>'</l><r></r></p></e>
    </section>
</dictionary>
